Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.100

Loans or other obligations secured by real property.

An association may invest its funds in loans, mortgages, or other obligations secured by real property.

[ 1982 c 3 s 46; 1979 c 113 s 7; 1969 c 107 s 5; 1949 c 20 s 6; 1945 c 235 s 67; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3717-186. Prior: 1939 c 98 s 11; 1935 c 9 ss 1, 2, 3; 1933 c 183 ss 56, 58; 1925 ex.s. c 144 s 5; 1913 c 110 ss 8, 9; 1903 c 116 s 2; 1890 p 56 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1979 c 113: See note following RCW 33.04.020.